Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-550
Class III school district elections; change number of board members; resolution; contents; change manner of election.

(1) The school board of a Class III school district may, by resolution adopted in an odd-numbered year, provide for a change in the number of members on the school board to a minimum of five members and a maximum of nine members to be effective at the beginning of the term of office for school board members elected at the next statewide general election. The school board shall include in the resolution:

(a) A statement of the change in number of members to be added to or eliminated from the school board;

(b) A statement that the change does not take effect until the beginning of the term of office for school board members elected at the next statewide general election;

(c) If the members are not nominated or elected by district or ward in the school district:

(i) If the change in number adds members to the school board, a statement of the number of members to be elected at the next statewide general election, including the members whose terms are expiring and the additional members, and the number of such members to be elected to four-year terms and the number of such members to be elected to two-year terms so that approximately one-half of the total number of members are elected at each statewide general election. The members receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms, and the members receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to two-year terms; and

(ii) If the change in number decreases the number of members on the school board, a statement of the number of members to be elected at the next statewide general election, if any, and at the subsequent statewide general election, if necessary, and the number of such members to be elected at such elections to four-year terms and the number of such members to be elected at such elections to two-year terms so that approximately one-half of the total number of members are elected at each statewide general election. The members receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms, and the members receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to two-year terms; and

(d) If the members are nominated or elected by district or ward in the school district:

(i) The changes to the boundaries of districts or wards;

(ii) A statement that the changes to the boundaries are effective for purposes of nominating or electing, as applicable, members to the school board beginning with the next statewide primary and general elections but that the changes in boundaries are not effective for purposes of representation until the beginning of the term of office for school board members elected at the next statewide general election;

(iii) A statement of which districts or wards, as changed, are on the ballot at the next statewide primary or general election, as applicable, and whether the members elected from such districts or wards are being elected for four-year terms or two-year terms;

(iv) A statement specifying the newly established districts which each member will represent for the remainder of his or her term, if necessary;

(v) If the change in number adds members to the school board, a statement of the number of members to be elected at the next statewide general election, including the members whose terms are expiring and the additional members, and the districts or wards of such members to be elected to four-year terms and the districts or wards of such members to be elected to two-year terms so that approximately one-half of the total number of members are elected at each statewide general election; and

(vi) If the change in number decreases the number of members on the school board, a statement of the number of members to be elected at the next statewide general election, if any, and at the subsequent statewide general election, if necessary, and the districts or wards of such members to be elected at such elections to four-year terms and the districts or wards of such members to be elected at such elections to two-year terms so that approximately one-half of the total number of members are elected at each statewide general election.

(2) If the members of the school board of a Class III school district are nominated and elected by district or ward, the board may by resolution provide for the nomination of the members by district or ward and the election of the members at large. If the members are nominated by district or ward and elected at large, the board may by resolution provide for the nomination and election of the members by district or ward.

(3) Any Class III school district which has a nine-member school board on January 1, 2015, may continue to have a nine-member school board without complying with the requirements of this section.

Laws 1974, LB 592, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 303, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 602;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-803.11;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 303;

Laws 1997, LB 595, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 38.